Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GLOBAL COMPETENCY DEVELOPMENT PILOT PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a pilot program to provide grants to one or more nonprofit organizations to train students at multiple sites statewide in global competency skills necessary for future workforce competitiveness, including critical thinking, collaboration, comfort with unfamiliar situations, and forming opinions based on evidence. Grant recipients must obtain a minimum 25 percent nonstate match to any grant award. Funds may be used for program costs, including teacher training, curriculum development, and support to participating schools. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end